South Dakota, session 2026, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 46-6-3.1 be AMENDED:
46-6-3.1. No application to appropriate groundwater may be approved if,
according to the best information reasonably available, it is probable that the quantity of
water withdrawn annually from a groundwater source will exceed the quantity of the
average estimated annual recharge of water to the groundwater source. An application
may be approved, however, for withdrawals of groundwater from any groundwater
formation older than or stratigraphically lower than the greenhorn formation in excess of
the average estimated annual recharge for use by water distribution systems.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.